Louisiana, session 2026, HB1192.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:463.243 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§463.243. Special prestige license plate; Louisiana Dental Hygienists' Association;
"Registered Dental Hygienist"
A.(1) The secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall
establish a special prestige motor vehicle license plate to be known as the "Louisiana
Dental Hygienists' Association" plate, which may be issued, upon application, to any
citizen of Louisiana, provided there is a minimum of one thousand applicants for
such plate. The plates shall be restricted to use on passenger cars, pick up trucks,
recreational vehicles, and vans.
(2) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, shall create this special prestige license plate when the applicable statutory
provisions are met and the department's electronic vehicle and registration system
is updated to accommodate the creation of the new plates.
B. The design shall be in compliance with R.S. 47:463(A)(3). The plate shall
be white and light purple. The bottom of the plate shall bear the words "Registered
Dental Hygienist" and, directly below, shall bear the name "Louisiana Dental
Hygienists' Association". A symbol representing the Louisiana Dental Hygienists'
Association shall appear on the left portion of the plate. The letters "RDH" shall
appear vertically in the center portion of the plate followed by four alpha-numeric
digits for registration purposes.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1192 ENROLLED
C. The prestige license plate shall be issued, upon application, to any citizen
of Louisiana in the same manner as any other motor vehicle license plate.
D. The department shall collect an annual royalty fee of twenty-five dollars
that shall be disbursed in accordance with Subsection E of this Section. This fee
shall be in addition to the standard motor vehicle license tax imposed by Article VII,
Section 5 of the Constitution of Louisiana, and a handling fee of three dollars and
fifty cents for each plate to be retained by the department to offset a portion of
administrative costs.
E. The annual royalty fee shall be collected by the department and forwarded
to the Louisiana Dental Hygienists' Association. The monies received from the
royalty fees shall be used solely for the activities of the Louisiana Dental Hygienists'
Association.
F. The secretary shall adopt rules and regulations as are necessary to
implement the provisions of this Section.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.